District of Columbia statutes.
29-102.13

Establishment of Corporate Recordation Fund; disposition of entity filing fees.

(a)

There is established the Corporate Recordation Fund (“Fund”), which shall be classified as a proprietary fund and a type of enterprise fund for the purposes of § 47-373(1). The Fund shall be credited with all fees:

(1)

That are identified in § 29-102.12 that are collected for Chapters 10, 12, and 13;

(2)

That are identified as expedited fees and the fees collected for the enforcement of Chapters 10, 12, and 13; and

(3)

Collected for the processing of corporate filings, including renewals, fines, and option service fees.

(b)

Revenue credited to the Fund shall be expended by the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs as designated by an appropriations act of Congress for the purposes of maintaining and upgrading the corporate filing system, including copying fees, automation upgrades, personnel costs, and supplies.

(c)

Fees and charges payable to the Mayor shall be paid at the time of presenting a document for filing or making a request for information for which a fee or charge is payable.

(d)

Overpayments and duplicate and erroneous payments shall be refunded. A mere change of purpose after the payment of money, as when a party desires to withdraw a filing, shall not entitle a party to a refund.

(e)

Except noted under subsection (d) of this section, all other fees shall be deemed processing fees and shall be nonrefundable.

(f)

The Mayor may cancel a processed filing due to nonpayment.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-305, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2735

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2855.05.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-305 substituted “10, 12, and 13” for “10 and 12” in (a)(1) and (a)(2).